Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1704
Forms of policy.

Credit life insurance and credit accident and health insurance shall be issued only in the following forms:

(1) Individual policies of life insurance issued to debtors on the term plan;

(2) Individual policies of accident and health insurance issued to debtors on a term plan or disability benefit provisions in individual policies of credit life insurance;

(3) Group policies of life insurance issued to creditors providing insurance upon the lives of debtors on the term plan; or

(4) Group policies of accident and health insurance issued to creditors on a term plan insuring debtors or disability benefit provisions in group credit life insurance policies to provide such coverage.

Laws 1959, c. 214, § 4, p. 738.